Vermont, session 2025-2026, H109.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. § 2291 is amended to read:
§ 2291. ENUMERATION OF POWERS
For the purpose of promoting the public health, safety, welfare, and
convenience, a town, city, or incorporated village shall have the following
powers:
* * *
(31) To regulate by means of an ordinance the maintenance of premises
within a designated downtown district and to compel the owner of a premises
within a designated downtown district to maintain or repair the premises
against decay or deterioration.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379204 v.1